Utah statutes.
54-8b-6.   Prohibition on subsidization of telecommunications services.

A telecommunications corporation providing intrastate public telecommunications services may not subsidize its intrastate telecommunications services which are exempted from regulation or offered pursuant to a price list or competitive contract under authority of this chapter with proceeds from its other intrastate telecommunications services not so exempted or made subject to a price list or competitive contract.  Similarly, proceeds from intrastate telecommunications services which are exempted from regulation or offered pursuant to a price list or competitive contract as authorized by this chapter may not subsidize other intrastate telecommunications services not so exempted or made subject to a price list or competitive contract.

